Utah statutes.
78B-5-614.   Filing of affidavit -- Original or certified copy as evidence.

If an affidavit is made in an action or special proceeding pending in a court, it may be filed with the court or clerk of the court.  If not made in an action or special proceeding pending in a court, it may be filed with the recorder of the county where the newspaper is published.  The original affidavit, or a copy certified by the judge of the court or officer having it in custody, is prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the affidavit.

